Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 2. Board of Trustees

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d Colleges and Universities §§ 9 to 17.

14A C.J.S. Colleges and Universities §§ 15 to 17.

§ 21-17-201.
Composition; appointment and qualifications of members generally; members ex officio; quorum.

The government of the university is vested in a board of twelve (12) trustees appointed by the governor, no two (2) of whom may be residents of the same county of the state. At least one (1) trustee shall be appointed from each appointment district pursuant to W.S.

9-1-218

. Not more than seventy-five percent (75%) of the members of the board shall be registered in the same political party. The governor, the president of the university, the state superintendent of public instruction and the president of the associated students of the university are members ex officio, having the right to speak, but not to vote. A majority of the board is a quorum.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 75, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 488; C.S. 1910, § 413; C.S. 1920, § 468; Laws 1921, ch. 119, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 108-504; C.S. 1945, § 70-104; Laws 1947, ch. 104, § 1; 1951, ch. 105, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-350; Laws 1969, ch. 118, § 1; 1977, ch. 21, § 2; ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-2-201

; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective February 14, 2013; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2013 amendments. —

The first 2013 amendment, by ch. 1 § 2, added “the director of the department of education” in the sixth sentence.

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const.
Approved January 29, 2013.

The second 2013 amendment, by ch. 42 § 1, substituted “thirteen (13)” for “twelve (12)” in the first sentence, and added the second sentence.

Laws 2013, ch. 42, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const.
Approved January 29, 2013.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2015 amendment,

in the next-to-last sentence, deleted “the director of the department of education” preceding “and the president.”

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “seventy-five percent (75%) of the” for “seven (7)” following “Not more than.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 42, § 2, directs:
“This act is effective only if the electors
adopt a constitutional
amendment at the 2014 general election removing
the requirement that
all trustees of the University of Wyoming must
be a resident of the
state of Wyoming, as provided in 2013 Senate
Joint Resolution 1.”

Section 3
provides: “Notwithstanding
W.S.

21-17-202

, the initial term of the board of trustee member appointed
pursuant
to this act shall expire on March 1, 2021. The governor
shall nominate,
and the additional board member shall be confirmed,
in accordance
with
W.S.

21-17-202

.”

Section 4
provides: “The legislature finds that the University
of Wyoming prepares
students for life in a global economy and that
the university is
integrally involved in a world extending well beyond
the borders
of Wyoming. Removing restrictions on qualifications for
potential
board of trustee members as provided in this act reflects
those realities
while at the same time ensuring that all or nearly
all trustees will
be Wyoming residents.”

Section 5
provides: “Subject to section 2 of this act, this act
is effective
upon certification of the election results of the 2014
general election.”

Laws 2016, ch. 119, § 2 states as follows: “Nothing in this act shall be deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority, board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

Cited

in

Hjorth Royalty Co. v. University of Wyoming, 30 Wyo. 309, 222 P. 9,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(1924).

§ 21-17-202.
Term; appointment of additional trustees; appointment of successors; vacancies; members of faculty disqualified; removal.

The term of office of the trustees appointed is six (6) years. During each session of the legislature, the governor shall nominate, and with the advice and consent of the senate, appoint successors to those trustees whose term of office has expired or will expire before the next session of the legislature. Any vacancy in the board of trustees caused by death, resignation, removal from the state or otherwise, shall be filled by appointment by the governor as provided in W.S.

28-12-101

. No member of the faculty, while holding that position, shall ever be appointed a trustee. The governor may remove any trustee as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

Effective July 1, 1979, appointments and terms shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 75, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 489; C.S. 1910, § 414; C.S. 1920, § 469; R.S. 1931, § 108-505; C.S. 1945, § 70-105; Laws 1951, ch. 105, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 21-351; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-2-202

; Laws 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1987, ch. 175, § 1.

Editor's note. —

Laws 2013, ch. 42, § 3, provides: “Notwithstanding W.S.

21-17-202

, the initial term of the board of trustee member appointed pursuant to this act shall expire on March 1, 2021. The governor shall nominate, and the additional board member shall be confirmed, in accordance with W.S.

21-17-202

.”

Cited

in

People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1942).

§ 21-17-203.
To be body corporate; powers, duties and functions generally.

The board of trustees and their successors in office constitute a body corporate by the name of “the trustees of the University of Wyoming”. They possess all the powers necessary or convenient to accomplish the objects and perform the duties prescribed by law, and shall have custody of the books, records, buildings and all other property of the university. The board shall elect a chairman, secretary and treasurer, who shall perform the duties prescribed in the bylaws of the board. The treasurer shall execute a bond, with approved sureties in double the sum likely to come into his hands, for the faithful discharge of his duties. The term of office of board officers, their duties severally and the times for holding meetings shall be fixed in the bylaws of the board. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business but a less number may adjourn from time to time, and all routine business may be entrusted to an executive committee of no fewer than three (3) members subject to such conditions as the bylaws of the board prescribe. The board may from time to time appoint and authorize a person to examine and approve for payment all legal claims against the corporation. The person shall give bond with surety approved by the board, payable to the state of Wyoming in such sum as the board may fix, conditioned for the faithful performance of his duties. A certificate of appointment signed by the chairman and secretary of the board and the bond shall be filed with the state auditor. At each meeting of the board all action taken by the person so appointed subsequent to the immediately preceding board meeting shall be submitted to the board for its approval or disapproval. The actual and necessary traveling expenses of nonresident members in attending the annual meeting of the board may be audited by the auditing committee thereof and paid by warrant on the treasurer out of the general fund of the university.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 75, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 490; C.S. 1910, § 415; C.S. 1920, § 470; R.S. 1931, § 108-506; C.S. 1945, § 70-106; Laws 1947, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-352; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-2-203

; Laws 2019, ch. 110, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to acceptance of federal aid, see §

21-2-601

.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted "chairman" for "president" throughout, and substituted "no fewer than three (3) members" for "three (3) members."

Board only has powers bestowed by legislature. —

The board of trustees of the university of Wyoming and the Wyoming highway commission have only such authority as bestowed upon them by the legislature of the state of Awe v. University of Wyoming, 534 P.2d 97,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1975).

It is like other boards and commissions managing state agencies. —

An examination of the duties of the board of trustees fails to distinguish it from the highway commission or the game and fish commission or the state board of charities and reform or the numerous other commissions and boards charged with the management and operation of a multitude of state government. Awe v. University of Wyoming, 534 P.2d 97,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1975).

Which serve totality of state government. —

Though at times it may appear, in their zeal to perform their assigned tasks, various state agencies have declared their independence from the state of Wyoming, still these are all state bodies under one flag, having but one function, and that is serving the totality of state agencies. Awe v. University of Wyoming, 534 P.2d 97,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1975).

It has no authority to sue or be sued. —

It would appear that more authority is placed in the highway commission than in the board of trustees of the university of Wyoming in that at least the highway commission has authority to sue and be sued. The university board of trustees does not have similar authority. Awe v. University of Wyoming, 534 P.2d 97,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1975).

There is no provision in this section and §

21-17-204

authorizing suits against the board of trustees. Williams v. Eaton, 443 F.2d 422,

1971 U.S. App. LEXIS 10184

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1971).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Wyoming Agric. College v. Irvine, 14 Wyo. 318, 84 P. 90,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1906); Hjorth Royalty Co. v. University of Wyoming, 30 Wyo. 309, 222 P. 9,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(1924); Arnold v. Bond, 47 Wyo. 236, 34 P.2d 28,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1934).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Colleges and Universities: The Demise of In Loco Parentis,” see VI Land & Water L. Rev. 715 (1971).

§ 21-17-204.
Additional powers and duties; sectarian or partisan instruction or test prohibited; professional services procurement.

The board of trustees shall prescribe rules for the government of the university and all its branches, elect the requisite officers, professors, instructors and employees, a director of finance and budget and a superintendent of buildings and grounds, any of whom may be removed for cause, and fix the salary and term of office of each. The board of trustees shall prescribe the studies to be pursued and the textbooks to be used, and determine the qualifications of applicants for admission to the various courses of study. No instruction either sectarian in religion or partisan in politics shall ever be allowed in any department of the university, and no sectarian or partisan test shall ever be exercised or allowed in the appointment of trustees or in the election or removal of professors, teachers or other officers of the university or in the admission of students thereto, or for any purpose whatsoever. The board of trustees may:

Confer such degrees and grant such diplomas as are usual in universities or as they deem appropriate;

Through bylaws confer upon the faculty the power to suspend or expel students for causes therein prescribed;

Possess and use for the benefit of the institution all property of the university;

Hold, manage, lease or dispose of, according to law, any real or personal estate as is conducive to the welfare of the institution;

Expend the income placed under their control from whatever source derived, and exercise all other functions properly belonging to such a board and necessary to the prosperity of the university and all its departments.

The board of trustees shall adopt university regulations consistent with the requirements of W.S.

9-2-3006

for capital construction projects let by the University of Wyoming.

The board of trustees shall procure the professional services of architects, engineers and surveyors in accordance with W.S. 9-23-105(f) through (h) and 9-23-106(g).

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 75, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 491; C.S. 1910, § 416; C.S. 1920, § 471; R.S. 1931, § 108-507; Laws 1933, ch. 70, § 1; 1943, ch. 31, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 70-107; Laws 1957, ch. 155, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-353; Laws 1961, ch. 148, § 32; 1965, ch. 115, § 33; 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-2-204

; 2020 ch. 29, § 2, effective October 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 30, § 1, effective October 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 29, § 2, effective October 1, 2020, added (b).

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 30, § 1, effective October 1, 2020, added (b).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Agreements and contracts made by board obligate state funds. —

In the operation of the university, any agreement or contracts made by the board of trustees would obligate and be a charge upon the state funds appropriated for the operation of the university. Retail Clerks Local 187 v. Retail Clerks Local 187 v. University of Wyoming, 531 P.2d 884,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1975).

Cited

in

Hjorth Royalty Co. v. University of Wyoming, 30 Wyo. 309, 222 P. 9,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(1924); Awe v. University of Wyo., 534 P.2d 97,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1975).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Through the Front Door,” XIX Wyo. L.J. 164 (1965).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of college or university regulation of political or voter registration activity in student housing facilities, 39 ALR4th 1137.

College's power to revoke degree, 57 ALR4th 1243.

§ 21-17-205.
Report.

The trustees of the University of Wyoming, through their chairman, shall report to the governor as required by W.S.

9-2-1014

respecting the progress, condition and wants of the university and of each school or department thereof, the course of study in each, the number of professors and students, the nature, costs and results of important investigations, and such other information as they deem important or as may be required by any law of this state, or of the United States. The secretary and treasurer of the board of trustees shall prepare an itemized report showing the receipts and disbursements for the year, the appropriation resolution for that year, the purposes for which the revenue was expended, and the amount of revenue expended upon each school or department of work, including the experiment station.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 51, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1899, § 492; C.S. 1910, § 417; C.S. 1920, § 472; R.S. 1931, § 108-508; C.S. 1945, § 70-108; W.S. 1957, § 21-354; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1; 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-205; Laws 2010, ch. 69, § 207; 2019 ch. 110, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted “to accompany the report” following “an itemized report,” and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “The reports are to be printed and not less than one hundred (100) copies filed with the secretary of state for distribution among the members of the legislature and other public officers.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “chairman” for “president.”

§ 21-17-206.
Secretary to take oath of office and administer oaths.

The secretary of the board of trustees of the University of Wyoming, before entering upon the duties of the office, shall take the oath of office provided for elective officers under the constitution of this state.

The secretary of the board of trustees of the University of Wyoming may administer oaths and affirmations to any person or persons in connection with the business of the university.

History.

Laws 1897, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1899, §§ 495, 496; C.S. 1910, §§ 420, 421; C.S. 1920, §§ 475, 476; R.S. 1931, §§ 108-511, 108-512; C.S. 1945, §§ 70-115, 70-116; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-355, 21-356; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-2-206.

Cross references. —

As to constitutional oath of office, see art. 6, § 20, Wyo. Const.

§ 21-17-207.
University board composition; community college ex-officio member.

In addition to the members of the university board of trustees specified under W.S.

21-17-201

, the director of the Wyoming community college commission shall serve as a member ex officio, having the right to speak but not to vote.

History:

2014 ch. 92, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 92, § 1, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.